New York, session 2025-2026, S9567.
do enact as follows:
Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as
"Nima's law".
§ 2. Subdivision 5 of section 3380 of the public health law, as
amended by chapter 667 of the laws of 1989, paragraphs (b) and (f) as
amended by chapter 551 of the laws of 1990, is amended to read as
follows:
5. (a) No person shall use nitrous oxide for purposes of causing
intoxication, inebriation, excitement, stupefaction or the dulling of
the brain or nervous system of [himself] themself or another.
(b) No person shall sell any canister or other container of nitrous
oxide unless granted an exemption pursuant to this subdivision. [In no
event shall any canister or other container of nitrous oxide be sold to
a person under the age of twenty-one years.]
(c) This subdivision shall not apply to the use of nitrous oxide in
industrial, medical or dental applications, or to specific products
which must use nitrous oxide as a propellant provided such products
shall in no event be sold at retail to the public, as shall be deter-
mined by the commissioner pursuant to paragraph (d) of this subdivision.
(d) The commissioner [is directed to] shall promulgate regulations to
exempt specific products which must use nitrous oxide, or a mixture of
nitrous oxide with other gases, as a propellant from the provisions of
EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets
[ ] is old law to be omitted.
LBD15348-02-6

S. 9567--A 2
this chapter provided such regulations shall prohibit the sale of such
products at retail to the public.
(e) The provisions of this section shall not be deemed to prohibit the
sale of food products containing nitrous oxide provided such products
comply with the provisions of section sixteen-a of the agriculture and
markets law.
[(f) The commissioner may, upon the application of a manufacturer or
seller of a product containing nitrous oxide and intended for sale at
retail, authorize the sale of such a product if there is no evidence of
substantial misuse of the product as defined by this subdivision and if
the manufacturer or seller takes the following steps to:
(i) clearly indicate the legitimate purpose or use of the product on
the package;
(ii) display prominently on the package in heavy type print language
which warns of health dangers resulting from the misuse of nitrous
oxide;
(iii) demonstrate that the product bears a distinctive feature or
features enabling it to be clearly distinguished from the nitrous oxide
products of other manufacturers;
(iv) educate wholesale and retail businesses which sell the product of
the dangers of nitrous oxide and the need to monitor its sale; and
(v) prevent their sale of the product to any person, firm or corpo-
ration who or which sells drug-related paraphernalia as such term is
defined by subdivision two of section eight hundred fifty of the general
business law.]
§ 3. Section 834 of the general business law is REPEALED.
§ 4. The general business law is amended by adding a new article 38-C
to read as follows:
ARTICLE 38-C
NITROUS OXIDE
Section 840. Definitions.
841. Restrictions on sale.
842. Restrictions on the sale of nitrous oxide; exemption
required.
843. Enforcement.
844. Preemption.
§ 840. Definitions. For the purposes of this article, the following
terms shall have the following meanings:
1. "Acceptable Sale" for the purposes of this article shall mean the
sale of nitrous oxide authorized to be sold under an exception estab-
lished in subdivision five of section thirty-three hundred eighty of the
public health law.
2. "Nitrous oxide" for the purposes of this article means nitrous
oxide but shall not include food products containing nitrous oxide
provided such products comply with the provisions of section sixteen-a
of the agriculture and markets law.
3. "Retail sale" or "at retail" means a sale to a consumer or to any
person for any purpose other than for resale. For the purposes of this
section, the term "retail sale" shall not include an acceptable sale of
nitrous oxide.
§ 841. Restrictions on sale. 1. No person, corporation, partnership,
limited liability company, firm, or any other business entity doing
business within this state shall sell or offer for sale nitrous oxide at
retail to the public unless the sale would be deemed an acceptable sale.
2. Any person, corporation, partnership, limited liability company,
firm, or any other business entity that violates the provisions of this

S. 9567--A 3
section shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than two thou-
sand five hundred dollars for an initial offense and not more than five
thousand dollars for the second and each subsequent offense.
§ 842. Restrictions on the sale of nitrous oxide; exemption required.
1. It shall be a violation of this section for any person, corporation,
partnership, limited liability company, firm or other business entity
doing business within the state to possess with the intent to sell or
offer for sale nitrous oxide without an exemption granted by the depart-
ment of health pursuant to subdivision five of section thirty-three
hundred eighty of the public health law.
2. Any person, corporation, partnership, limited liability company,
firm, or any other business entity that violates the provisions of this
section shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than two thou-
sand five hundred dollars for an initial offense and not more than five
thousand dollars for the second and each subsequent offense.
§ 843. Enforcement. The attorney general or any state or local health
officer, town, village or city attorney, or the chief executive officer
of a municipality may institute an action in a court of competent juris-
diction to enjoin any activity prohibited pursuant to this article.
§ 844. Preemption. This article preempts all local ordinances and
regulations governing the sale of nitrous oxide, with all such ordi-
nances enacted prior to the effective date rendered void.
§ 5. Subdivision 1 of section 207 of the public health law is amended
by adding a new paragraph (t) to read as follows:
(t) The dangers associated with the misuse of nitrous oxide, includ-
ing, but not limited to, vitamin B-12 deficiency, impaired motor func-
tion, psychiatric disturbances, loss of consciousness, asphyxiation, and
death. The commissioner shall consult with the commissioner of the
office of addiction services and supports when developing education and
outreach programs under this provision.
§ 6. Severability clause. If any clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivi-
sion, section or part of this act shall be adjudged by any court of
competent jurisdiction to be invalid, such judgement shall not affect,
impair, or invalidate the remainder thereof but shall be confined in its
operation to the clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivision, section or
part thereof directly involved in the controversy in which such judge-
ment shall have been rendered. It is hereby declared to be the intent of
the legislature that this act would have been enacted even if such
invalid provisions had not been included herein.
§ 7. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after
it shall have become a law.